Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,190
Not-for-profit organization, defined.

As used in sections 25-21,190 to 25-21,193, unless the context otherwise requires, not-for-profit organization shall mean any not-for-profit entity which is exempt from federal income taxation pursuant to section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code and listed as an exempt organization in section 501(c)(2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (11), or (19) of the Internal Revenue Code and which is engaged in one or more activities within this state in furtherance of a purpose for which it is organized.

Laws 1987, LB 67, § 1;

Laws 1988, LB 912, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 574, § 39.